apertium-eo-en.eo.dix.xml
<pardef n="quant0__det_pl">
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="ser__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
<!--
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>us</l>                  <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
-->
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<!--
<e r="RL" c="TODO:remetu">    <p><l>ita</l>                 <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="sgplnomacc"/></e>
-->

<!--
<e>                           <p><l>onta</l>                <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp2"/></r></p><par n="sgplnomacc"/></e>
-->
  <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
<!--
<e>                           <p><l>inta</l>                <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p><par n="sgplnomacc"/></e>
<e>                           <p><l>anta</l>                <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>ante</l>                <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL" c="TODO:remetu">    <p><l>anta</l>                <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="sgplnomacc"/></e>
-->
  <e r="RL"><p><l>anta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e       ><p><l>anta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>anta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e       ><p><l>antaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e       ><p><l>antan</l>     <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>antan</l>     <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e       ><p><l>antajn</l>    <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ante</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="pov/i__vaux">
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL" c="TODO"><p><l>anta</l><r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ante</l>      <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<!-- Ne uzataj en->eo c="TODO"
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>ante</l>                <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ita</l>                 <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>itaj</l>                <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>itan</l>                <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>itajn</l>               <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>onta</l>                <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ontaj</l>               <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>anta</l>                <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>u</l>                   <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>inta</l>                <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>inta</l>                <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>intaj</l>               <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
-->
</pardef>

<e lm="povi">            <i>pov</i><par n="pov/i__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="devi">            <i>dev</i><par n="pov/i__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="voli">     <i>vol</i><par n="pov/i__vaux"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="ebli">     <i>ebl</i><par n="pov/i__vaux"/></e>
    <e lm="voli"><i>vol</i><par n="pov/i__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="esti">            <i>est</i><par n="ser__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tiom multe da">   <i>tiom<b/>multe<b/>da</i><par n="quant0__det_pl"/></e>
<e lm="malpli da">       <i>malpli<b/>da</i><par n="quant0__det_pl"/></e>
